lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
LEXICON Caseopt
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1optimista
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possioptimista;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurioptimista;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famioptimista;

LEXICON Possioptimista
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famopt;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famopt;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famopt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famopt;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famopt;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famopt;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famopt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famopt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famopt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famopt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famopt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famopt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famioptimista;

LEXICON Plurioptimista
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genopt;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1oe§k    Genopt;
                            Geni1ioptimista;

LEXICON Famioptimista
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genopt;
                       Geni1ioptimista;


LEXICON Geni1ioptimista
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseopt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseopt;
                       Casei1ioptimista;

LEXICON Casei1ioptimista
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                           Ik;


LEXICON AddAdjaonly
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1aonly;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseaonly;

Lexicon Tocase1aonly
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possaonly;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmaonly;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famaonly;

Lexicon Tocaseaonly
[stem]+Adj:0     Possaonly;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluraonly;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famaonly;

LEXICON Possaonly
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famaonly1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famaonly1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famaonly1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famaonly1;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famaonly1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famaonly1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famaonly1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famaonly1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famaonly1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famaonly1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famaonly1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famaonly1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famaonly;
LEXICON Pluraonly
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genaonly;
                            Genaonly1;
LEXICON Plurmaonly
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genaonly;
                            Genaonly1;
        
LEXICON Famaonly
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genaonly;
                       Genaonly;
LEXICON Famaonly1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genaonly;
                       Genaonly1;

LEXICON Genaonly
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseaonly;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseaonly;
                       Caseaonly;
LEXICON Genaonly1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseaonly;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseaonly;
                       Caseaonly1;
 
LEXICON Caseaonly
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseaonly1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
							Ik;


! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdj3
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase31;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocase3;

Lexicon Tocase31
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possm3;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurm3;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famm3;

Lexicon Tocase3
[stem]+Adj:0     Poss3;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plur3;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fam3;

LEXICON Adj
amolyan AddAdj3;
csakolyan AddAdj3;
duplaolyan AddAdj3;
feleolyan AddAdj3;
olyan AddAdj3;
szintolyan AddAdj3;
ugyanolyan AddAdj3;
vadiúj AddAdjaonly;
vadonatúj AddAdjaonly;
éppolyan AddAdj3;
új AddAdjaonly;
újdonatúj AddAdjaonly;
